Utah statutes.
58-17b-302.   License classifications of pharmacy facilities.
(1)  A license is required to act as a pharmacy, except as specifically
exempted from licensure under Section 58-1-307.
(2)  The division shall issue a pharmacy license to a facility that qualifies
under this chapter in the classification of a:
(a)  class A pharmacy;
(b)  class B pharmacy;
(c)  class C pharmacy;
(d)  class D pharmacy; or
(e)  class E pharmacy.
(3)  Each place of business shall require a separate license.  If multiple
pharmacies exist at the same address, a separate license shall be required for
each pharmacy.
(4)  The division may further define or supplement the classifications of
pharmacies.  The division may impose restrictions upon classifications to
protect the public health, safety, and welfare.
(5)  Each pharmacy shall have a pharmacist-in-charge, except as otherwise
provided by rule.
(6)  Whenever an applicable statute or rule requires or prohibits action by a
pharmacy, the pharmacist-in-charge and the owner of the pharmacy shall be
responsible for all activities of the pharmacy, regardless of the form of the
business organization.
